test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-CLASS_AANG_gt-norm.yaml
     k̲ínyaang+V+SINGULAR+IMPERATIVE: k̲ínyaang
     k̲ínyaang+V+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: k̲ínyaangga
     k̲ínyaang+V+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: k̲ínyaang
     k̲ínyaang+V+SIMPLE+PRESENT: k̲ínyaanggang
     k̲ínyaang+V+DIRECT+PAST: k̲ínyaanggan
     k̲ínyaang+V+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: k̲ínyaangaa
     k̲ínyaang+V+INDIRECT+PAST: k̲ínyaangaan
     k̲ínyaang+V+RELATIVE: k̲ínyaangs
     k̲ínyaang+V+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: k̲ínyaangaas
     k̲ínyaang+V+NON_FACTIVE: k̲ínyaangang
     k̲ínyaang+V+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: k̲ínyaangaa.ang
     k̲ínyaang+V+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: k̲ínyaanggang
     k̲ínyaang+V+PRESENT+HABITUAL: k̲ínyaangganggang
     k̲ínyaang+V+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: k̲ínyaanggangang
     k̲ínyaang+V+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲ínyaanggiinii
     k̲ínyaang+V+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲ínyaangaangaa
     k̲ínyaang+V+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲ínyaangaangaan
     k̲ínyaang+V+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: k̲ínyaangäsaa
     k̲ínyaang+V+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: k̲ínyaangäs
     k̲ínyaang+V+SIMPLE+FUTURE: k̲ínyaangäsaang
     k̲ínyaang+V+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: k̲ínyaangäsga
     k̲ínyaang+V+RELATIVE+FUTURE: k̲ínyaangäsaas
     k̲ínyaang+V+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: k̲ínyaangäsaa.ang
     k̲ínyaang+V+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: k̲ínyaangang k̲asa'áa
     k̲ínyaang+V+NEAR+FUTURE: k̲ínyaangang k̲asa'áang
     k̲ínyaang+V+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: k̲ínyaangang k̲asaasdláa
     k̲ínyaang+V+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: k̲ínyaangang k̲asaasdláang
     k̲ínyaang+V+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: k̲ínyaang'uuj
     k̲ínyaang+V+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: k̲ínyaang'uujang
     k̲ínyaang+V+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: k̲ínyaangäsaa'uujang
     k̲ínyaang+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: k̲ínyaang'us
     k̲ínyaang+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: k̲ínyaang'ujaa
     k̲ínyaang+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲ínyaang'uujaangaa
     k̲ínyaang+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: k̲ínyaangäsaa'us
     k̲ínyaang+V+CERTAIN+PRESENT: k̲ínyaang'ahlanggang
     k̲ínyaang+V+CERTAIN+PAST: k̲ínyaang'ahlanggan
     k̲ínyaang+V+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲ínyaang'ahlanggiinii
     k̲ínyaang+V+CERTAIN+FUTURE: k̲ínyaangäsaa'ahlans
     k̲ínyaang+V+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: k̲ínyaang'ahlans
     k̲ínyaang+V+INTENSIVE+PAST: k̲ínyaangaa'ahlang
     k̲ínyaang+V+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: k̲ínyaangaa'ahlanggaa
     k̲ínyaang+V+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: k̲ínyaangaa'ahlanggang
     k̲ínyaang+V+REFLEXIVE: k̲ínyaang'ahl
     k̲ínyaang+V+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: k̲ínyaangäseehl
     k̲ínyaang+V+PLURAL+IMPERATIVE: k̲ínyaang'uu
     k̲ínyaang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: k̲ínyaang'waa
     k̲ínyaang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: k̲ínyaang'waa
     k̲ínyaang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+PRESENT: k̲ínyaang'waang
     k̲ínyaang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST: k̲ínyaang'wägan
     k̲ínyaang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: k̲ínyaang'aawaa
     k̲ínyaang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST: k̲ínyaang'aawaan
     k̲ínyaang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE: k̲ínyaang'waas
     k̲ínyaang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: k̲ínyaang'aawaas
     k̲ínyaang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NON_FACTIVE: k̲ínyaang'waa.ang
     k̲ínyaang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: k̲ínyaang'aawaa.ang
     k̲ínyaang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: k̲ínyaanggang'waa
     k̲ínyaang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL: k̲ínyaanggang'waang
     k̲ínyaang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: k̲ínyaanggang'waa.ang
     k̲ínyaang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲ínyaang'wägiinii
     k̲ínyaang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲ínyaang'wägaangaa
     k̲ínyaang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲ínyaang'wägaangaan
     k̲ínyaang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: k̲ínyaang'waaäsaa
     k̲ínyaang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: k̲ínyaang'waaäs
     k̲ínyaang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+FUTURE: k̲ínyaang'waaäsaang
     k̲ínyaang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: k̲ínyaang'waaäsga
     k̲ínyaang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+FUTURE: k̲ínyaang'waaäsaas
     k̲ínyaang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: k̲ínyaang'waaäsaa.ang
     k̲ínyaang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: k̲ínyaang'waa.ang k̲asa'áa
     k̲ínyaang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NEAR+FUTURE: k̲ínyaang'waa.ang k̲asa'áang
     k̲ínyaang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: k̲ínyaang'waa.ang k̲asaasdláa
     k̲ínyaang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: k̲ínyaang'waa.ang k̲asaasdláang
     k̲ínyaang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: k̲ínyaang'waa'uuj
     k̲ínyaang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: k̲ínyaang'waa'uujang
     k̲ínyaang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: k̲ínyaang'waaäsaa'uujang
     k̲ínyaang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: k̲ínyaang'waa'us
     k̲ínyaang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: k̲ínyaang'waa'ujaa
     k̲ínyaang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲ínyaang'waa'uujaangaa
     k̲ínyaang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: k̲ínyaang'waaäsaa'us
     k̲ínyaang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PRESENT: k̲ínyaang'waa'ahlanggang
     k̲ínyaang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST: k̲ínyaang'waa'ahlanggan
     k̲ínyaang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲ínyaang'waa'ahlanggiinii
     k̲ínyaang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+FUTURE: k̲ínyaang'waaäsaa'ahlans
     k̲ínyaang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: k̲ínyaang'waa'ahlans
     k̲ínyaang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTENSIVE+PAST: k̲ínyaang'aawaa'ahlang
     k̲ínyaang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: k̲ínyaang'aawaa'ahlanggaa
     k̲ínyaang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: k̲ínyaang'aawaa'ahlanggang
     k̲ínyaang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+REFLEXIVE: k̲ínyaang'waa'ahl
     k̲ínyaang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: k̲ínyaang'waaäseehl
     k̲ínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+SINGULAR+IMPERATIVE: k̲ínyaang'ang
     k̲ínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: k̲ínyaang'angga
     k̲ínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: k̲ínyaang'ang
     k̲ínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: k̲ínyaang'anggang
     k̲ínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+DIRECT+PAST: k̲ínyaang'anggan
     k̲ínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: k̲ínyaang'aangaa
     k̲ínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+INDIRECT+PAST: k̲ínyaang'aangaan
     k̲ínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE: k̲ínyaang'ans
     k̲ínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: k̲ínyaang'aangaas
     k̲ínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+NON_FACTIVE: k̲ínyaang'angang
     k̲ínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: k̲ínyaang'aangaa.ang
     k̲ínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: k̲ínyaang'anggang
     k̲ínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: k̲ínyaanggang'anggang
     k̲ínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: k̲ínyaanggang'angang
     k̲ínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲ínyaang'anggiinii
     k̲ínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲ínyaang'anggaangaa
     k̲ínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲ínyaang'anggaangaan
     k̲ínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: k̲ínyaang'angäsaa
     k̲ínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: k̲ínyaang'angäs
     k̲ínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+SIMPLE+FUTURE: k̲ínyaang'angäsaang
     k̲ínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: k̲ínyaang'angäsga
     k̲ínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE+FUTURE: k̲ínyaang'angäsaas
     k̲ínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: k̲ínyaang'angäsaa.ang
     k̲ínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: k̲ínyaangang k̲asaa'áng
     k̲ínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: k̲ínyaangang k̲asaa'ánggang
     k̲ínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: k̲ínyaangang k̲asaasdlä'áng
     k̲ínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: k̲ínyaangang k̲asaasdlä'ánggang
     k̲ínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: k̲ínyaang'ang'uuj
     k̲ínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: k̲ínyaang'ang'uujang
     k̲ínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: k̲ínyaang'angäsaa'uujang
     k̲ínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: k̲ínyaang'ang'us
     k̲ínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: k̲ínyaang'ang'ujaa
     k̲ínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲ínyaang'ang'uujaangaa
     k̲ínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: k̲ínyaang'angäsaa'us
     k̲ínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PRESENT: k̲ínyaang'aang'ahlanggang
     k̲ínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PAST: k̲ínyaang'aang'ahlanggan
     k̲ínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲ínyaang'aang'ahlanggiinii
     k̲ínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+FUTURE: k̲ínyaang'angäsaa'ahlans
     k̲ínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: k̲ínyaang'aang'ahlans
     k̲ínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+INTENSIVE+PAST: k̲ínyaang'aangaa'ahlang
     k̲ínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: k̲ínyaang'aangaa'ahlanggaa
     k̲ínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: k̲ínyaang'aangaa'ahlanggang
     k̲ínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+REFLEXIVE: k̲ínyaang'aang'ahl
     k̲ínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: k̲ínyaang'angäseehl
     k̲ínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+PLURAL+IMPERATIVE: k̲ínyaang'ang'uu
     k̲ínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: k̲ínyaang'ang'waa
     k̲ínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: k̲ínyaang'ang'waa
     k̲ínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+PRESENT: k̲ínyaang'ang'waang
     k̲ínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST: k̲ínyaang'ang'wägan
     k̲ínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: k̲ínyaang'ang'aawaa
     k̲ínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST: k̲ínyaang'ang'aawaan
     k̲ínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE: k̲ínyaang'ang'waas
     k̲ínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: k̲ínyaang'ang'aawaas
     k̲ínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NON_FACTIVE: k̲ínyaang'ang'waa.ang
     k̲ínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: k̲ínyaang'ang'aawaa.ang
     k̲ínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: k̲ínyaanggang'ang'waa
     k̲ínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL: k̲ínyaanggang'ang'waang
     k̲ínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: k̲ínyaanggang'ang'waa.ang
     k̲ínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲ínyaang'ang'wägiinii
     k̲ínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲ínyaang'ang'wägaangaa
     k̲ínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲ínyaang'ang'wägaangaan
     k̲ínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: k̲ínyaang'ang'waaäsaa
     k̲ínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: k̲ínyaang'ang'waaäs
     k̲ínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+FUTURE: k̲ínyaang'ang'waaäsaang
     k̲ínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: k̲ínyaang'ang'waaäsga
     k̲ínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+FUTURE: k̲ínyaang'ang'waaäsaas
     k̲ínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: k̲ínyaang'ang'waaäsaa.ang
     k̲ínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: k̲ínyaang'waa.ang k̲asaa'áng
     k̲ínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NEAR+FUTURE: k̲ínyaang'waa.ang k̲asaa'ánggang
     k̲ínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: k̲ínyaang'waa.ang k̲asaasdlä'áng
     k̲ínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: k̲ínyaang'waa.ang k̲asaasdlä'ánggang
     k̲ínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: k̲ínyaang'ang'waa'uuj
     k̲ínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: k̲ínyaang'ang'waa'uujang
     k̲ínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: k̲ínyaang'ang'waaäsaa'uujang
     k̲ínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: k̲ínyaang'ang'waa'us
     k̲ínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: k̲ínyaang'ang'waa'ujaa
     k̲ínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲ínyaang'ang'waa'uujaangaa
     k̲ínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: k̲ínyaang'ang'waaäsaa'us
     k̲ínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PRESENT: k̲ínyaang'ang'waa'ahlanggang
